Tennessee, session 114, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-141(b), is amended by
redesignating the current language as subdivision (b)(1) and adding the following new
subdivision:
(2) The department must make the forms available on the department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1263
003234
- 1 -